Florida, session 2026, HB809.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Paragraph (c) of subsection (3) of section
458.315, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
458.315 Temporary certificate for practice in areas of
critical need.—
(3) The board may issue a temporary certificate under this
section subject to the following restrictions:
(c)1. Any certificate issued under this section is valid
only so long as one of the following conditions applies:
a. The State Surgeon General determines that the reason
for which it was issued remains a critical need to the state; or
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb809 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 809 2026 Legislature
b. The certificate was issued for practice in an area of
critical need that has since lost its designation and the
certificateholder maintains an active primary care treatment
relationship in the area with one or more patients. In such
case, the certificateholder may continue providing primary care
services to patients in such area under the certificate if the
board finds that all other requirements are satisfied during its
review of the certificateholder.
2. The board shall review each temporary certificateholder
at least annually to ascertain that the certificateholder is
complying with the minimum requirements of the Medical Practice
Act and its adopted rules, as applicable to the
certificateholder. If it is determined that the
certificateholder is not meeting such minimum requirements, the
board must revoke such certificate or impose restrictions or
conditions, or both, as a condition of continued practice under
the certificate.
Section 2. Paragraph (c) of subsection (3) of section
459.0076, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
459.0076 Temporary certificate for practice in areas of
critical need.—
(3) The board may issue this temporary certificate subject
to the following restrictions:
(c)1. Any certificate issued under this section is valid
only so long as one of the following conditions applies:
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb809 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 809 2026 Legislature
a. The State Surgeon General determines that the reason
for which it was issued remains a critical need to the state; or
b. The certificate was issued for practice in an area of
critical need that has since lost its designation and the
certificateholder maintains an active primary care treatment
relationship in the area with one or more patients. In such
case, the certificateholder may continue providing primary care
services to patients in such area under the certificate if the
board finds that all other requirements are satisfied during its
review of the certificateholder.
2. The board shall review each temporary certificateholder
at least annually to ascertain that the certificateholder is
complying with the minimum requirements of the Osteopathic
Medical Practice Act and its adopted rules, as applicable to the
certificateholder. If it is determined that the
certificateholder is not meeting such minimum requirements, the
board must revoke such certificate or impose restrictions or
conditions, or both, as a condition of continued practice under
the certificate.
Section 3. Paragraph (c) of subsection (3) of section
464.0121, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
464.0121 Temporary certificate for practice in areas of
critical need.—
(3) The board may issue a temporary certificate under this
section subject to the following restrictions:
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb809 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 809 2026 Legislature
(c)1. Any certificate issued under this section is valid
only so long as one of the following conditions applies:
a. The State Surgeon General maintains the determination
that the critical need that supported the issuance of the
temporary certificate remains a critical need to the state; or
b. The certificate was issued for practice in an area of
critical need that has since lost its designation and the
certificateholder maintains an active primary care treatment
relationship in the area with one or more patients. In such
case, the certificateholder may continue providing primary care
services to patients in such area under the certificate if the
board finds that all other requirements are satisfied during its
review of the certificateholder.
2. The board shall review each temporary certificateholder
at least annually to ascertain that the certificateholder is
complying with the minimum requirements of the Nurse Practice
Act and its adopted rules, as applicable to the
certificateholder. If it is determined that the
certificateholder is not meeting such minimum requirements, the
board must revoke such certificate or impose restrictions or
conditions, or both, as a condition of continued practice under
the certificate.
Section 4. This act shall take effect upon becoming a law.
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb809 -01-er